viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX tM Y 38
SFX tM outre outre/ foutre  is:infi
SFX tM outre outant/ foutre  is:ppre
SFX tM outre outu/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tM outre outus/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tM outre outue/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tM outre outu·e/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX tM outre outues/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tM outre outu·es/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tM outre ous/ foutre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX tM outre out/ foutre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX tM outre outons/ foutre  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX tM outre outez/ foutre  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX tM outre outent/ foutre  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX tM outre outais/ foutre  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX tM outre outait/ foutre  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX tM outre outions/ foutre  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX tM outre outiez/ foutre  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX tM outre outaient/ foutre  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX tM outre outrai/ foutre  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX tM outre outras/ foutre  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX tM outre outra/ foutre  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX tM outre outrons/ foutre  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX tM outre outrez/ foutre  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX tM outre outront/ foutre  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX tM outre outrais/ foutre  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX tM outre outrait/ foutre  is:cond is:3sg
SFX tM outre outrions/ foutre  is:cond is:1pl
SFX tM outre outriez/ foutre  is:cond is:2pl
SFX tM outre outraient/ foutre  is:cond is:3pl
SFX tM outre oute/ foutre  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX tM outre outes/ foutre  is:spre is:2sg
SFX tM outre ous/ foutre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX tM outre outons/ foutre  is:impe is:1pl
SFX tM outre outez/ foutre  is:impe is:2pl
SFX tM outre outu-e/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX tM outre outu-es/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tM outre outu·e·s/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tM outre outu-e-s/ foutre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX tU Y 11
SFX tU istre istre/ tistre  is:infi
SFX tU istre issu/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tU istre issus/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tU istre issue/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tU istre issu·e/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX tU istre issues/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tU istre issu·es/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tU istre issu-e/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX tU istre issu-es/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tU istre issu·e·s/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX tU istre issu-e-s/ tistre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX uA Y 52
SFX uA tre tre/ tre  is:infi
SFX uA tre tant/ tre  is:ppre
SFX uA tre tu/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uA tre tus/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uA tre tue/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uA tre tu·e/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX uA tre tues/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uA tre tu·es/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uA ttre ts/ ttre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uA ttre t/ ttre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX uA tre ts/ embatre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uA tre t/ embatre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX uA tre tons/ tre  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX uA tre tez/ tre  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX uA tre tent/ tre  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX uA tre tais/ tre  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uA tre tait/ tre  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX uA tre tions/ tre  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX uA tre tiez/ tre  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX uA tre taient/ tre  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX uA tre tis/ tre  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uA tre tit/ tre  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX uA tre tîmes/ tre  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX uA tre tîtes/ tre  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX uA tre tirent/ tre  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX uA tre trai/ tre  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX uA tre tras/ tre  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX uA tre tra/ tre  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX uA tre trons/ tre  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX uA tre trez/ tre  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX uA tre tront/ tre  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX uA tre trais/ tre  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uA tre trait/ tre  is:cond is:3sg
SFX uA tre trions/ tre  is:cond is:1pl
SFX uA tre triez/ tre  is:cond is:2pl
SFX uA tre traient/ tre  is:cond is:3pl
SFX uA tre te/ tre  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX uA tre tes/ tre  is:spre is:2sg
SFX uA tre tisse/ tre  is:simp is:1sg
SFX uA tre tisses/ tre  is:simp is:2sg
SFX uA tre tît/ tre  is:simp is:3sg
SFX uA tre tissions/ tre  is:simp is:1pl
SFX uA tre tissiez/ tre  is:simp is:2pl
SFX uA tre tissent/ tre  is:simp is:3pl
SFX uA tre s/ tre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX uA tre ts/ embatre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX uA tre tons/ tre  is:impe is:1pl
SFX uA tre tez/ tre  is:impe is:2pl
SFX uA tre tu-e/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX uA tre tu-es/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uA tre tu·e·s/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uA tre tu-e-s/ tre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX uC Y 49
SFX uC battre battre/ battre  is:infi
SFX uC battre battant/ battre  is:ppre
SFX uC battre battu/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX uC battre battus/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX uC battre battue/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX uC battre battu·e/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX uC battre battues/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX uC battre battu·es/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uC battre bats/ battre  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uC battre bat/ battre  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX uC battre battons/ battre  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX uC battre battez/ battre  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX uC battre battent/ battre  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX uC battre battais/ battre  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uC battre battait/ battre  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX uC battre battions/ battre  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX uC battre battiez/ battre  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX uC battre battaient/ battre  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX uC battre battis/ battre  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uC battre battit/ battre  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX uC battre battîmes/ battre  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX uC battre battîtes/ battre  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX uC battre battirent/ battre  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrai/ battre  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX uC battre battras/ battre  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX uC battre battra/ battre  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX uC battre battrons/ battre  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX uC battre battrez/ battre  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX uC battre battront/ battre  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX uC battre battrais/ battre  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX uC battre battrait/ battre  is:cond is:3sg
SFX uC battre battrions/ battre  is:cond is:1pl
SFX uC battre battriez/ battre  is:cond is:2pl
SFX uC battre battraient/ battre  is:cond is:3pl
SFX uC battre batte/ battre  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX uC battre battes/ battre  is:spre is:2sg
SFX uC battre battisse/ battre  is:simp is:1sg
SFX uC battre battisses/ battre  is:simp is:2sg
SFX uC battre battît/ battre  is:simp is:3sg
SFX uC battre battissions/ battre  is:simp is:1pl
SFX uC battre battissiez/ battre  is:simp is:2pl
SFX uC battre battissent/ battre  is:simp is:3pl
SFX uC battre bats/ battre  is:impe is:2sg
SFX uC battre battons/ battre  is:impe is:1pl
SFX uC battre battez/ battre  is:impe is:2pl
SFX uC battre battu-e/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX uC battre battu-es/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uC battre battu·e·s/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX uC battre battu-e-s/ battre  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
