viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
abattre/uA  po:verb
battre/uA  po:verb
combattre/uA  po:verb
contrebattre/uA  po:verb
contrefoutre/tM  po:verb
débattre/uA  po:verb
ébattre/uC  po:verb
embatre/uA  po:verb
embattre/uA  po:verb
foutre/tM  po:verb
rabattre/uA  po:verb
rebattre/uA  po:verb
refoutre/tM  po:verb
soubattre/uA  po:verb
tistre/tU  po:verb
